Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2095XC (1) 91 jm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 423.3, subsection 47A, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The sales price from the sale of central office equipment 3 or transmission equipment primarily used by local exchange 4 carriers and competitive local exchange service providers; 5 by franchised cable television operators, mutual companies, 6 municipal utilities, cooperatives, and companies furnishing 7 communications services that are not subject to rate regulation 8 as provided in chapter 476 ; by long distance companies as 9 defined in section 477.10 ; or for a commercial mobile radio 10 service as defined in 47 C.F.R. Â§20.3 in the furnishing of 11 telecommunications services on a commercial basis. 12